Hawaii, session 2025, GM1236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that school health
assistants may administer medications to students who require
certain medications in public schools. However, due to
increasing vacancies for school health assistants, many schools
experience challenges in meeting the needs of students who are
prescribed medications or may benefit from receiving medications
in emergency situations while on campus. This lapse of
continued care may risk the health and safety of students who
rely on the timely administration of certain medications.
To ensure the health and safety of students, other school
staff who volunteer to administer medication can be effective
substitutes once these individuals complete training and general
instruction on medication administration. Therefore, requiring
volunteers to complete training that includes correctly
interpreting the health care provider's orders; identifying the
correct student; identifying the correct route of
administration, either oral, nasal, or topical; confirming the
2025-2670 SB532 GDI SMA.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO. "2
C.D. 1
correct dose; administering medications at the right time of
day; and documenting medication administration, can ensure
accountability and the necessary safeguards for student health.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize public
school employees or agents who have completed appropriate
training to administer medication for students consistent with
standards applicable to school health assistants.
SECTION 2. Section 302A-853, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) School health assistants, and public school employees
and agents trained by a health care professional employed or
contracted by the department, may assist students by
administering oral, nasal, and topical medication, and in
emergency situations, other premeasured medication; provided
that:
(1) If the student receiving the medication is a minor, a
parent or guardian requests and authorizes the
administration of medication;
(2) The medication has been prescribed by a [licensed]
physician[7—as defined in soction--334-l,—or by a
practitioner] or physician assistant licensed pursuant
2025-2670 SB532 CDl SMA.docx ;
liiMilHHIIIIIIIIIIHII

Page 3 S.B. NO 532
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
to chapter 453, an advanced practice registered nurse
with prescriptive authority [-?-] licensed pursuant to
chapter 457, or by another licensed health care
practitioner with prescriptive authority;
(3) The administration of the medication is with the
approval of a health care professional within the
department, department of health, or health care
service as defined in section 323D-2 pursuant to a
written agreement with the department; and
(4) The administration of the medication is necessary for
the health of the student and for the student's
attendance at school."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2670 SB532 CDl SMA.docx
inwiEiiiiiiiiiiiHniii

S.B. NO.
"2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 30th day of May .2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI

S.B. No. 532, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 532, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives